California, session 20252026, SB29.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 377.34 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:377.34. (a) In an action or proceeding by a decedent’s personal representative or successor in interest on the decedent’s cause of action, the damages recoverable are limited to the loss or damage that the decedent sustained or incurred before death, including, but not limited to, damages for pain, suffering, or disfigurement, and any penalties or punitive or exemplary damages that the decedent would have been entitled to recover had the decedent lived.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in an action or proceeding by a decedent’s personal representative or successor in interest on the decedent’s cause of action, the damages recoverable may include damages for pain, suffering, or disfigurement if the action or proceeding was granted a preference pursuant to Section 36 before January 1, 2022, or was filed on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2030. 2027.(c) A plaintiff who recovers damages pursuant to subdivision (b) between January 1, 2026, and January 1, 2029, July 31, 2026, inclusive, shall, within 60 days after obtaining a judgment, consent judgment, or court-approved settlement agreement entitling the plaintiff to the damages, submit to the Judicial Council a copy of the judgment, consent judgment, or court-approved settlement agreement, along with a cover sheet detailing all of the following information:(1) The date the action was filed.(2) The date of the final disposition of the action.(3) The amount and type of damages awarded, including economic damages and damages for pain, suffering, or disfigurement.(4) Any party to the action or proceeding may submit the data specified in this subdivision to the Judicial Council.(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2029, 2027, the Judicial Council shall transmit to the Legislature a report detailing the information received pursuant to subdivision (c) for all judgments, consent judgments, or court-approved settlement agreements rendered from January 1, 2025, to July 31, 2029, 2026, inclusive, in which damages were recovered pursuant to subdivision (b). The report shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, unless the Legislature takes action to extend or make its provisions permanent. (e) This section does not alter Section 3333.2 of the Civil Code.(f) This section does not affect claims brought pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.